Utah statutes.
75-7-1003.   Damages in absence of breach.
(1)  A trustee is accountable to an affected beneficiary for any profit made
by the trustee arising from the administration of the trust, even absent a
breach of trust.
(2)  Absent a breach of trust, a trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for a
loss or depreciation in the value of trust property or for not having made a
profit.
